Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF706.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 21.6, subsection 3, paragraphs a and d, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: a. Shall assess each member of the governmental body who participated in its violation damages in the amount of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars and not less than one five hundred dollars. However, if a member of a governmental body knowingly participated in such a violation, damages shall be in the amount of not more than two twelve thousand five hundred dollars and not less than one five thousand dollars. These damages shall be paid by the court imposing it to the state of Iowa, if the body in question is a state governmental body, or to the local government involved if the body in question is a local governmental body. A member of a governmental body found to have violated this chapter shall not be assessed such damages if that member proves that the member did any of the following: (1) Voted against the closed session. (2) Had good reason to believe and in good faith believed facts which, if true, would have indicated compliance with all the requirements of this chapter . (3) Reasonably relied upon a decision of a court, a formal opinion of the Iowa public information board, the attorney House File 706, p. 2 general, or the attorney for the governmental body, given in writing, or as memorialized in the minutes of the meeting at which a formal oral opinion was given, or an advisory opinion of the Iowa public information board, the attorney general, or the attorney for the governmental body, given in writing. d. Shall issue an order removing a member of a governmental body from office if that member has engaged in a prior violation of this chapter for which damages were assessed against the member during the memberâs term . Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 21.12 Member education course required. 1. A newly elected or appointed public official who is a member of a governmental body shall complete a course of training of not less than one and not more than two hours regarding the responsibilities of the governmental body and the governmental bodyâs members under this chapter and chapter 22 not later than the ninetieth day after the date the member does one of the following, as applicable: a. Takes the initial oath of office. b. Assumes responsibilities, if the member is not required to take an oath of office. c. Is elected to the office. 2. The Iowa public information board shall ensure that the training is made available. The Iowa public information board may provide the training and may also approve any acceptable course of training offered by a governmental body or other entity. The Iowa public information board shall ensure that at least one course of training approved or provided by the Iowa public information board is available at no cost. 3. The Iowa public information board or other entity providing the training shall provide a certificate of course completion to persons who complete the training required by this section. A governmental body shall maintain and make available for public inspection the record of the governmental bodyâs membersâ completion of the training. a. Completing the required training as a member of the governmental body satisfies the requirements of this section with regard to the memberâs service on a committee or subcommittee of the governmental body and the memberâs service House File 706, p. 3 on any other governmental body. b. The training required by this section may be used to satisfy any corresponding training requirements concerning this chapter and chapter 22 as required by law for the members of a governmental body. 4. If one or more members of a governmental body fail to complete the training required by this section, the failure does not affect the validity of an action taken by the governmental body. However, the member must complete training within sixty days or may be assessed damages as described in section 21.6, subsection 3. 5. This section does not apply to a member of a governmental body if the member or governmental body is excluded from the jurisdiction of the Iowa public information board under section 23.12. Sec. 3. Section 22.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsections: NEW SUBSECTION . 76. Information obtained from security camera systems operated by the legislative branch monitoring property owned or leased by the state. NEW SUBSECTION . 77. Information obtained from state employee identification card access systems for buildings and rooms owned or leased by the state. Sec. 4. Section 23.6, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 8. After appropriate board proceedings, issue orders with the force of law, determining whether there has been a violation of chapter 21 or 22 , requiring compliance with specified provisions of those chapters, imposing civil penalties equivalent to and to the same extent as those provided for in section 21.6 , 21.12, or 22.10 , as applicable, on a respondent who has been found in violation of chapter 21 or 22 , and imposing any other appropriate remedies calculated to declare, terminate, or remediate any violation of those chapters. Sec. 5. Section 23.10, subsection 3, paragraph b, subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: (1) Require the respondent to pay damages as provided for in section 21.6 , 21.12, or 22.10 , whichever is applicable, to the House File 706, p. 4 extent that provision would make such damages payable if the complainant had sought to enforce a violation in court instead of through the board. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 706, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor